Missouri, session 2026, HB1850.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 338.600, 376.387, and 376.388, RSMo, are repealed and four
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 338.600, 376.388, 376.394, and
376.399, to read as follows:
338.600. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Audit", any review, inspection, investigation, examination, or analysis
conducted by a pharmacy benefits manager (PBM) or its representative of a pharmacy's
records, claims, practices, or compliance with contractual obligations or legal
requirements, which may result in recoupment, repayment demand, chargeback,
penalty, or other financial adjustment. Routine verification or inquiry regarding claim
elements or documentation shall not constitute an audit; however, no recoupment,
repayment demand, chargeback, penalty, or financial adjustment shall be based upon or
initiated through such inquiry unless the inquiry is converted to an audit and conducted
in compliance with the requirements of this section;
(2) "Entity", a managed care company, insurance company, or third-party
payer, or representative of a managed care company, insurance company, or third-party
payer, or a pharmacy benefits manager or a subcontractor of a pharmacy benefits
manager.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, when an audit of the
records of a pharmacy licensed in this state is conducted by [a managed care company,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 2
insurance company, third-party payor, or] any entity [that represents such companies or
groups], such audit shall be conducted in accordance with the following:
(1) The entity conducting the initial on-site audit shall provide the pharmacy with
notice at least [one week] fourteen days prior to conducting the initial on-site audit for each
audit cycle and shall specify specific prescriptions to be audited, which may include the
final two digits of the prescription numbers. The notice required under this subsection
shall be in writing and shall be sent by means that allow tracking of delivery to the
pharmacist or pharmacy not later than the fourteenth day before the date on which the
on-site audit is scheduled to occur. A pharmacy benefits manager is not required to
provide notice before conducting an audit if, after reviewing claims data, written or oral
statements of pharmacy staff, wholesalers, or other investigative information, including
patient referrals, the plan issuer or pharmacy benefits manager suspects the pharmacist
or pharmacy subject to the audit committed fraud or made an intentional
misrepresentation related to the pharmacy business, which cause and suspicion shall
be disclosed to the pharmacy upon initiation of the audit;
(2) Any audit which involves clinical judgment shall be conducted by or in
consultation with a [licensed] pharmacist licensed by the Missouri board of pharmacy, and
such pharmacist shall be made available to the audited pharmacy to discuss clinical
rationale and Missouri legal requirements;
(3) Any clerical error, record-keeping error, typographical error, or scrivener's error
regarding a required document or record shall not constitute fraud or grounds for recoupment,
so long as the prescription was otherwise legally dispensed and the claim was otherwise
materially correct; except that, such claims may be otherwise subject to recoupment of
overpayments or payment of any discovered underpayment. No claim arising under this
subdivision shall be subject to criminal penalties without proof of intent to commit fraud.
The pharmacy shall have the right to submit amended claims within thirty days of the
discovery of an error to correct clerical or record-keeping errors in lieu of recoupment if
the prescription was dispensed according to requirements set forth in state or federal
law;
(4) A pharmacy may use the records of a hospital, physician, or other authorized
practitioner of the healing arts involving drugs or medicinal supplies written or transmitted by
any means of communication for purposes of validating the pharmacy record with respect to
orders or refills of a legend or narcotic drug. Electronically stored images of prescriptions,
electronically created annotations and other related supporting documentation shall be
considered valid prescription records. Hard copy and electronic signature logs that indicate
the delivery of pharmacy services shall be considered valid proof of receipt of such services
by a program enrollee;

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 3
(5) A finding of an overpayment or underpayment may be a projection based on the
number of patients served and having a similar diagnosis or on the number of similar orders
or refills for similar drugs; except that, recoupment of claims shall be based on the actual
overpayment or underpayment unless the projection for overpayment or underpayment is part
of a settlement as agreed to by the pharmacy;
(6) Each pharmacy shall be audited under the same standards and parameters as other
pharmacies audited by the entity;
(7) A pharmacy shall be allowed at least thirty days following receipt of the
preliminary audit report in which to produce documentation to address any discrepancy found
during an audit;
(8) An audit shall be limited to forty unique prescriptions, with a maximum of
two hundred separately adjudicated claims, that have been randomly selected, and such
randomness shall be reflected by auditing similar types of prescriptions as are
collectively adjudicated. The following provisions shall apply:
(a) If an audit reveals the necessity for a review of additional claims, the audit
shall be conducted on site;
(b) An entity shall not initiate an audit of a pharmacy more than two times in a
calendar year; such audit of pharmacy records includes any prescription information
request by an auditing entity that could result in recoupment; and
(c) The list of the claims subject to an on-site audit shall be provided in the notice
under paragraph (a) of this subdivision to the pharmacist or pharmacy and shall
identify the claims only by the prescription numbers or a date range for prescriptions
subject to the audit. The last two digits of the prescription numbers provided may be
omitted;
(9) A recoupment shall not be based on a requirement that a pharmacy or
pharmacist perform a professional duty in addition to or exceeding professional duties
prescribed by the Missouri board of pharmacy;
(10) Recoupment shall only occur following the correction of a claim and shall be
limited to amounts adjudicated by a pharmacy benefits manager;
(11) Except for MO HealthNet claims, approval of drug, prescriber, or patient
eligibility upon adjudication of a claim shall not be reversed unless the pharmacy or
pharmacist obtained the adjudication by fraud, waste, or abuse, a misrepresentation of
claim elements, or claims that were not properly rendered or billed by a pharmacy or
pharmacist, or otherwise in accordance with state pharmacy audit laws. The following
provisions shall apply:

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 4
(a) This subdivision does not preclude a pharmacy benefits manager from
engaging in claims reconciliation activities relating to brand effective rates and generic
effective rates if:
a. They are identified and agreed to in contract; and
b. The activities do not result in a retroactive reduction or recoupment of
payment to the pharmacist or pharmacy for a previously adjudicated covered claim;
and
(b) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not charge a pharmacy or pharmacist a
fee relating to the adjudication of a claim;
(12) Any entity conducting an audit shall not be compensated, nor shall any of its
employees be compensated, directly or indirectly, based on any amounts recouped;
100 (13) An entity shall not charge a fee for conducting an on-site or a desk audit
101 unless there is a finding of actual fraud;
102 (14) The period covered by the audit shall not exceed a two-year period beginning
103 [two years prior to the initial date of the on-site portion of the audit unless otherwise provided
104 by contractual agreement or if] the date the claim was submitted for payment unless there
105 has been a previous finding of fraud or as otherwise provided by state or federal law;
106 [(9)] (15) An audit shall not be initiated or scheduled during the first [three] five
107 business days of any month due to the high volume of prescriptions filled during such time
108 unless otherwise consented to by the pharmacy;
109 [(10)] (16) The preliminary audit report shall be delivered to the pharmacy within one
110 hundred twenty days after conclusion of the audit, with reasonable extensions permitted. A
111 final audit report shall be delivered to the pharmacy within six months of receipt by the
112 pharmacy of the preliminary audit report or final appeal, as provided for in subsection [3] 4of
113 this section, whichever is later. Audit reports not delivered to the pharmacy in this
114 timeline shall be deemed to have no discrepancies and no recoupment shall be made;
115 [(11)] (17) Notwithstanding any other provision in this subsection, the entity
116 conducting the audit shall not use the accounting practice of extrapolation in calculating
117 recoupments or penalties for audits, except as otherwise authorized under subdivision (5) of
118 this subsection;
119 (18) The days' supply for unit-of-use items, such as topicals, drops, vials, and
120 inhalants, shall not be limited beyond manufacturer recommendations;
121 (19) If the only commercially available package size exceeds an entity's
122 maximum days' supply, the dispensing of such package size shall be accepted by the
123 entity and shall not be the basis for recoupment;

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 5
124 (20) If the only commercially available package size exceeds an entity's
125 maximum days' supply and the entity accepts the refill of such prescription, the entity
126 shall not recoup such claim as an early refill;
127 (21) The failure of a pharmacy to collect a co-payment shall not be the basis for
128 recoupment if the pharmacy provides documentation of billing of the claim and a
129 reasonable attempt to collect the co-payment; and
130 (22) In a wholesale invoice audit conducted by an entity:
131 (a) An entity shall not audit the claims of another entity;
132 (b) The following shall not form the basis for recoupment:
133 a. The National Drug Code for the dispensed drug is in a quantity that is a sub-
134 unit or multiple of the purchased drug as reflected on a supporting wholesale invoice;
135 b. The correct quantity dispensed is reflected on the audited pharmacy claim; or
136 c. The drug dispensed by the pharmacy on an audited pharmacy claim is
137 identical to the strength and dosage form of the drug purchased;
138 (c) The entity shall accept as evidence:
139 a. Supplier invoices issued prior to the date of dispensing the drug underlying
140 the audited claim;
141 b. Invoices from any supplier authorized by law to transfer ownership of the
142 drug acquired by the audited pharmacy;
143 c. Copies of supplier invoices in the possession of the audited pharmacy; and
144 d. Reports required by any state board or agency; and
145 (d) Within five business days of a request by the audited pharmacy, the entity
146 shall provide supporting documentation provided to the entity by the audited
147 pharmacy's suppliers.
148 [2.] 3. Recoupments of any disputed moneys shall only occur after final internal
149 disposition of the audit, including the appeals process set forth in subsection [3] 4 of this
150 section. Should the identified discrepancy for an individual audit exceed twenty-five
151 thousand dollars, future payments to the pharmacy in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars
152 may be withheld pending finalization of the audit.
153 [3.] 4. Each entity conducting an audit shall establish an appeals process, lasting no
154 longer than six months, under which a licensed pharmacy may appeal an unfavorable
155 preliminary audit report to the entity. If, following such appeal, the entity finds that an
156 unfavorable audit report or any portion thereof is unsubstantiated, the entity shall dismiss the
157 audit report or such portion without the necessity of any further proceedings.
158 [4.] 5. Each entity conducting an audit shall provide a copy of the final audit report,
159 after completion of any appeal process, to the plan sponsor. Such report shall include the
160 total amount of recoupment returned to the plan sponsor, if any.

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 6
161 [5.] 6. This section shall not apply to any investigative audit that involves probable
162 fraud, willful misrepresentation, or abuse.
163 [6.] 7. This section shall not apply to any audit conducted as part of any inspection or
164 investigation conducted by any governmental entity or law enforcement agency.
376.388. 1. As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Affiliated pharmacy", a pharmacy that directly or indirectly, through one
or more intermediaries, owns or controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common
ownership or control with a pharmacy benefits manager;
(2) "Contracted pharmacy" [or "pharmacy"], a pharmacy located in Missouri
participating in the network of a pharmacy benefits manager through a direct or indirect
contract;
[(2)] (3) "Health carrier", an entity subject to the insurance laws and regulations of
this state that contracts or offers to contract to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or
reimburse any of the costs of health care services, including a sickness and accident insurance
company, a health maintenance organization, a nonprofit hospital and health service
corporation, or any other entity providing a plan of health insurance, health benefits, or health
services, except that such plan shall not include any coverage pursuant to a liability insurance
policy, workers' compensation insurance policy, or medical payments insurance issued as a
supplement to a liability policy;
[(3)] (4) "Maximum allowable cost", the per-unit amount that a pharmacy benefits
manager reimburses a pharmacist for a prescription drug, excluding a dispensing or
professional fee;
[(4)] (5) "Maximum allowable cost list" or "MAC list", a listing of drug products that
meet the standard described in this section;
[(5)] (6) "Pharmacy", as such term is defined in chapter 338;
[(6)] (7) "Pharmacy benefits manager", an entity that contracts with pharmacies on
behalf of health carriers [or any health plan sponsored by the state or a political subdivision of
the state] or health benefit plans to provide prescription drug and pharmacist services.
2. Upon each contract execution or renewal between a pharmacy benefits manager
and a pharmacy or between a pharmacy benefits manager and a pharmacy's contracting
representative or agent, such as a pharmacy services administrative organization, a pharmacy
benefits manager shall, with respect to such contract or renewal:
(1) Include in such contract or renewal the sources utilized to determine maximum
allowable cost and update such pricing information at least every seven days; and
(2) Maintain a procedure to eliminate products from the maximum allowable cost list
of drugs subject to such pricing or modify maximum allowable cost pricing at least every

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 7
seven days, if such drugs do not meet the standards and requirements of this section, in order
to remain consistent with pricing changes in the marketplace.
3. A pharmacy benefits manager shall reimburse pharmacies for drugs subject to
maximum allowable cost pricing that has been updated to reflect market pricing at least every
seven days as set forth under subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section.
4. A pharmacy benefits manager shall not place a drug on a maximum allowable cost
list unless there are at least two therapeutically equivalent multisource generic drugs, or at
least one generic drug available from at least one manufacturer, generally available for
purchase by network pharmacies from national or regional wholesalers.
5. All contracts between a pharmacy benefits manager and a contracted pharmacy or
between a pharmacy benefits manager and a pharmacy's contracting representative or agent,
such as a pharmacy services administrative organization, shall include a process to internally
appeal, investigate, and resolve disputes regarding maximum allowable cost pricing. The
process shall include the following:
(1) The right to appeal shall be limited to fourteen calendar days following the
reimbursement of the initial claim; and
(2) A requirement that the pharmacy benefits manager shall respond to an appeal
described in this subsection no later than fourteen calendar days after the date the appeal was
received by such pharmacy benefits manager.
6. For appeals that are denied, the pharmacy benefits manager shall provide the
reason for the denial and identify the national drug code of a drug product that may be
purchased by contracted pharmacies at a price at or below the maximum allowable cost and,
when applicable, may be substituted lawfully.
7. If the appeal is successful, the pharmacy benefits manager shall:
(1) Adjust the maximum allowable cost price that is the subject of the appeal effective
on the day after the date the appeal is decided;
(2) Apply the adjusted maximum allowable cost price to all similarly situated
pharmacies as determined by the pharmacy benefits manager; and
(3) Allow the pharmacy that succeeded in the appeal to reverse and rebill the
pharmacy benefits claim giving rise to the appeal.
8. Appeals shall be upheld if:
(1) The pharmacy being reimbursed for the drug subject to the maximum allowable
cost pricing in question was not reimbursed as required under subsection 3 of this section; or
(2) The drug subject to the maximum allowable cost pricing in question does not meet
the requirements set forth under subsection 4 of this section.
9. A pharmacy benefits manager shall provide plan sponsors with such plan
sponsor's pharmacy claims data as reasonably requested by a plan sponsor.

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 8
10. The pharmacy benefits manager or plan sponsor shall provide the plan
sponsor and department of commerce and insurance documentation of any benefit
design that encourages or requires enrollees to fill prescriptions at affiliated pharmacies.
11. A pharmacy benefits manager shall exercise good faith and fair dealing in
the administration of pharmacy benefits and shall ensure that any conflicts of interest
that may clinically or financially impact covered patients or the health benefit plan
sponsor in a negative manner are disclosed.
12. All disclosures required under this section shall be provided to the plan
sponsor or its authorized agent in a universal manner.
13. If a pharmacy benefits manager or health plan has an affiliated pharmacy or
a pharmacy under common ownership, the pharmacy benefits manager shall disclose to
the plan sponsor and the department of commerce and insurance:
(1) The amount charged per dosage unit to the affiliated pharmacy; and
(2) The median amount charged per dosage unit at nonaffiliated, in-network
pharmacies.
14. The department of commerce and insurance may audit pharmacy benefits
managers to ensure compliance with this section.
376.394. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Critical-access care pharmacy", a Missouri-domiciled pharmacy with a
physical location in the state of Missouri that employs fewer than five hundred
employees across common ownership and that is:
(a) Located in:
a. A county or city with fewer than fifty thousand residents; or
b. A county or city with fifty thousand or more residents and in an area within
Missouri that is designated as a Primary Care or Mental Health Health Professional
Shortage Area (HPSA) or a Medically Underserved Area by the Health Resources and
Services Administration (HRSA), an agency of the U.S. Department of Health and
Human Services; or
(b) Any essential retail pharmacy as defined in Section 1860D-42 of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1395w-152, as amended by Pub. L. 119-75;
(2) "Similarly situated", a critical-access care pharmacy:
(a) That is in any of the pharmacy benefits manager's networks;
(b) That purchases the particular drug or medical product or device to which
the finding applies from the same pharmaceutical wholesaler as the pharmacy that
prevailed in the appeal; and
(c) To which the pharmacy benefits manager also applies the challenged rate of
reimbursement or actual cost.

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 9
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a pharmacy benefits
manager shall not reimburse a critical-access care pharmacy for a prescription drug or
device an amount that is less than the actual cost to that pharmacy for the prescription
drug or device plus a professional dispensing fee of ten dollars and fifty cents per claim.
The following provisions shall apply:
(1) A pharmacy benefits manager shall establish a process for a pharmacy to
appeal a reimbursement for failing to pay at least the actual cost and dispensing fee to
the critical-access care pharmacy for the prescription drug or device and shall permit a
critical-access care pharmacy or its designated agent to file an appeal using the standard
appeal form described in this section;
(2) If a critical-access care pharmacy chooses to contest a reimbursement for
failing to pay at least the actual cost the critical-access care pharmacy incurred for a
particular drug or medical product or device, the critical-access care pharmacy has the
right to designate a pharmacy services administrative organization or other agent to file
and handle its appeal; and
(3) The department of commerce and insurance shall create and make available
to pharmacy benefits managers and covered entities a standard form to be used by a
critical-access care pharmacy or its designated agent to file an appeal pursuant to this
subsection with a pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity.
3. If a critical-access care pharmacy or agent acting on behalf of a critical-access
care pharmacy prevails in an appeal provided for in this section, the pharmacy benefits
manager or covered entity shall, within seven business days after notice of the appeal is
received by the pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity:
(1) Make the necessary change to the challenged rate of reimbursement or actual
cost;
(2) If the product involved in the appeal is a drug, provide to the critical-access
care pharmacy or agent the National Drug Code number for the drug on which the
change is based;
(3) Permit the challenging critical-access care pharmacy to reverse and rebill the
claim upon which the appeal is based;
(4) Pay or waive the cost of any transaction fee required to reverse and rebill the
claim;
(5) Reimburse the critical-access care pharmacy at least in an amount equal to
the critical-access care pharmacy's actual cost for the prescription drug or device; and
(6) Apply the findings from the appeal as to the rate of reimbursement and
actual cost for the particular drug or medical product or device to other similarly
situated critical-access care pharmacies.

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 10
4. It is a violation of this section if, after an appeal in which a pharmacy or agent
acting on behalf of a critical-access care pharmacy prevails, a pharmacy benefits
manager or covered entity fails to reimburse the critical-access care pharmacy at least
actual cost.
5. If a critical-access care pharmacy or agent acting on behalf of a critical-access
care pharmacy loses or is denied an appeal provided for in this section, the following
provisions shall apply:
(1) If the product associated with the National Drug Code number or unique
device identifier is available at a cost that is less than the challenged rate of
reimbursement from a pharmaceutical wholesaler in this state, the pharmacy benefits
manager or covered entity shall, within seven business days after notice of the appeal is
received by the pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity, provide the appealing
critical-access care pharmacy or agent with:
(a) The name of the national or regional pharmaceutical wholesalers operating
in this state that have the particular drug or medical product or device currently in
stock at a price that is less than the amount of the challenged rate of reimbursement;
and
(b) If the product involved in the appeal is a drug, the National Drug Code
number for the drug; or
(c) If the product involved is a medical device, the unique device identifier for
the device; and
(2) If the product associated with the National Drug Code number or unique
device identifier is not available at a cost that is less than the challenged rate of
reimbursement from the pharmaceutical wholesaler from whom the critical-access care
pharmacy purchases the majority of prescription pharmaceutical products for resale,
the pharmacy benefits manager shall adjust the challenged rate of reimbursement to an
amount equal to or greater than the appealing critical-access care pharmacy's actual
cost and permit the critical-access care pharmacy to reverse and rebill each claim
affected by the inability to procure the pharmaceutical product at a cost that is equal to
or less than the previously challenged rate of reimbursement. The pharmacy benefits
manager shall pay or waive the cost of any transaction fee required to reverse and rebill
the claim.
6. The department of commerce and insurance shall enforce this section.
376.399. 1. Health benefit plans beginning on or after January 1, 2027, shall
comply with H.R. 7148, the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2026.
2. For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, no contract or
arrangement or renewal or extension of a contract or arrangement, entered into on or

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 11
after January 1, 2027, for services between a covered plan and a covered service
provider, or between a sponsor of a covered plan and a covered service provider,
through a health insurance issuer offering group health insurance coverage, a third-
party administrator, an entity providing pharmacy benefit management services, or
other entity, for pharmacy benefit management services, is reasonable within the
meaning of this section unless such entity providing pharmacy benefit management
services:
(1) Remits one hundred percent of rebates, fees, alternative discounts, and other
remuneration received from any applicable entity that are related to utilization of drugs
or drug spending under such health plan or health insurance coverage, to the group
health plan or, in the case of a health insurance issuer offering group health insurance
coverage in connection with a group health plan, to the health insurance issuer offering
group health insurance coverage on behalf of the plan; and
(2) Does not enter into any contract for pharmacy benefit management services
on behalf of such a plan or coverage with an applicable entity unless one hundred
percent of rebates, fees, alternative discounts, and other remuneration received under
such contract that are related to the utilization of drugs or drug spending under such
group health plan or health insurance coverage are remitted to the group health plan or,
in the case of a health insurance issuer offering group health insurance coverage in
connection with a group health plan, to the health insurance issuer on behalf of the plan
by the entity providing pharmacy benefit management services.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to affect the term of a contract or
arrangement, as in effect on January 1, 2027, except that such subsection shall apply to
any renewal or extension of such a contract or arrangement entered into on or after
such effective date, as so described.
3. With respect to such rebates, fees, alternative discounts, and other
remuneration, the rebates, fees, alternative discounts, and other remuneration under
this section shall be remitted:
(1) On a quarterly basis, to the group health plan or, in the case of a health
insurance issuer offering group health insurance coverage in connection with a group
health plan, to the group health insurance issuer on behalf of the plan, not later than
ninety days after the end of each quarter; or
(2) In the case of an underpayment in a remittance for a prior quarter, as soon as
practicable, but not later than ninety days after notice of the underpayment is first
given;

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 12
(3) Fully disclosed and enumerated to the group health plan or health insurance
issuer; and
(4) Returned to the covered service provider for pharmacy benefit management
services on behalf of the group health plan if any audit by a plan sponsor, issuer, or third
party designated by a plan sponsor indicates that the amounts received are in excess of
correct amounts after such amounts have been paid to the group health plan, in the
amount of such excess.
4. The department of commerce and insurance shall enforce this section and
shall have the right to any information described in this section from any pharmacy
benefits manager under investigation individually or in aggregate at the department's
request.
[376.387. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Covered person", the same meaning as such term is defined in
section 376.1257;
(2) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning as such term is defined in
section 376.1350;
(3) "Health carrier" or "carrier", the same meaning as such term is
defined in section 376.1350;
(4) "Pharmacy", the same meaning as such term is defined in chapter
338;
(5) "Pharmacy benefits manager", the same meaning as such term is
defined in section 376.388.
2. No pharmacy benefits manager shall include a provision in a
contract entered into or modified on or after August 28, 2018, with a pharmacy
or pharmacist that requires a covered person to make a payment for a
prescription drug at the point of sale in an amount that exceeds the lesser of:
(1) The copayment amount as required under the health benefit plan;
or
(2) The amount an individual would pay for a prescription if that
individual paid with cash.
3. A pharmacy or pharmacist shall have the right to provide to a
covered person information regarding the amount of the covered person's cost
share for a prescription drug, the covered person's cost of an alternative drug,
and the covered person's cost of the drug without adjudicating the claim
through the pharmacy benefits manager. Neither a pharmacy nor a pharmacist
shall be proscribed by a pharmacy benefits manager from discussing any such
information or from selling a more affordable alternative to the covered
person.
4. No pharmacy benefits manager shall, directly or indirectly, charge
or hold a pharmacist or pharmacy responsible for any fee amount related to a
claim that is not known at the time of the claim's adjudication, unless the
amount is a result of improperly paid claims or charges for administering a
health benefit plan.

HCS HBs 1850 & 1975 13
5. This section shall not apply with respect to claims under Medicare
Part D, or any other plan administered or regulated solely under federal law,
and to the extent this section may be preempted under the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 for self-funded employer-sponsored
health benefit plans.
6. A pharmacy benefits manager shall notify in writing any health
carrier with which it contracts if the pharmacy benefits manager has a conflict
of interest, any commonality of ownership, or any other relationship, financial
or otherwise, between the pharmacy benefits manager and any other health
carrier with which the pharmacy benefits manager contracts.
7. The department of commerce and insurance shall enforce this
section.]
✔